Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Proceedings - Requirements and Limitations - Determination of Just Compensation
38-1-121.
Appraisals - negotiations.

As soon as a condemning authority determines that it intends to acquire an interest in property, it shall give notice of such intent, together with a description of the property interest to be acquired, to anyone having an interest of record in the property involved. If the property has an estimated value of five thousand dollars or more, such notice shall advise that the condemning authority shall pay the reasonable costs of an appraisal pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. Such notice, however, need not be given to any of such persons who cannot be found by the condemning authority upon the exercise of due diligence. Upon receipt of such notice, such persons may employ an appraiser of their choosing to appraise the property interest to be acquired. Such appraisal shall be made using sound, fair, and recognized appraisal practices which are consistent with law. The value of the land or property actually taken shall be the fair market value thereof. Within ninety days of the date of such notice, such persons may submit to the condemning authority a copy of such appraisal. The condemning authority immediately upon receipt thereof shall submit to such persons copies of its appraisals. If the property interest is being acquired in relation to a federal aid project, then the appraisals submitted by the condemning authority shall be those which have been approved by it pursuant to applicable statutes and regulations, if such approval is required. All of these appraisals may be used by the parties to negotiate in good faith for the acquisition of the property interest, but neither the condemning authority nor such persons shall be bound by such appraisals.

If an appraisal is submitted to the condemning authority in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the condemning authority shall pay the reasonable costs of such appraisal. If more than one person is interested in the property sought to be acquired and such persons cannot agree on an appraisal to be submitted under subsection (1) of this section, the condemning authority shall be relieved of any obligation herein imposed upon it to pay for such appraisals as may be submitted to it pursuant to this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as in any way limiting the obligation of the condemning authority to negotiate in good faith for the acquisition of any property interest sought prior to instituting eminent domain proceedings or as in any way limiting the discovery rights of parties to eminent domain proceedings.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the condemning authority from complying with federal and state requirements to qualify the authority for federal aid grants.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of the condemning agency to institute eminent domain proceedings or to obtain immediate possession of property as permitted by law; except that an eminent domain proceeding may not proceed to trial on the issue of valuation until the ninety-day period provided in subsection (1) of this section has expired or the owner’s appraisal has been submitted to the condemning authority, whichever is sooner.

If the parties involved in the negotiations fail to reach agreement on the fair market value of the property being acquired, the condemning authority, prior to proceeding to trial on the issue of valuation, shall furnish all owners of record a written final offer.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1405, § 1, effective July 18.

L. 78:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 274, § 100, effective May 23.

L. 85:

(1) amended and (6) added, p. 1194, § 5, effective June 6.

38-1-122.
Attorney fees.

If the court finds that a petitioner is not authorized by law to acquire real property or interests therein sought in a condemnation proceeding, it shall award reasonable attorney fees, in addition to any other costs assessed, to the property owner who participated in the proceedings.

(1.5)

In connection with proceedings for the acquisition or condemnation of property in which the award determined by the court exceeds ten thousand dollars, in addition to any compensation awarded to the owner in an eminent domain proceeding, the condemning authority shall reimburse the owner whose property is being acquired or condemned for all of the owner’s reasonable attorney fees incurred by the owner where the award by the court in the proceedings equals or exceeds one hundred thirty percent of the last written offer given to the property owner prior to the filing of the condemnation action. The provisions of this subsection (1.5) shall not apply to any condemnation proceeding seeking to acquire rights-of-way under article 4, 5, or 5.5 of this title, article 45 of title 37, C.R.S., or section 7 of article XVI of the Colorado constitution.

Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed as limiting the ability of a property owner to recover just compensation, including attorney fees, as may otherwise be authorized by law.

History.

Source:
L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1195, § 6, effective June 6.

L. 2003:

(1.5) added, p. 2669, § 2, effective July 1.